Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.536

Power to bind and liability to limited partnership before dissolution of partnership of person dissociated as general partner.

(1) After a person is dissociated as a general partner and before the limited partnership is dissolved, converted under article 11 of this chapter, or merged out of existence under article 11 of this chapter, the limited partnership is bound by an act of the person only if:

(a) The act would have bound the limited partnership under RCW 25.10.381 before the dissociation; and

(b) At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

(i) Less than two years have passed since the dissociation; and

(ii) The other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner.

(2) If a limited partnership is bound under subsection (1) of this section, the person dissociated as a general partner that caused the limited partnership to be bound is liable:

(a) To the limited partnership for any damage caused to the limited partnership arising from the obligation incurred under subsection (1) of this section; and

(b) If a general partner or another person dissociated as a general partner is liable for the obligation, to the general partner or other person for any damage caused to the general partner or other person arising from the liability.

[ 2009 c 188 s 606.]